Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB540.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(a)(1) of the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 4. Procedures for registration as a contractor.(a) Application.--(1) A person shall apply to the bureau in writing or electronically via a secure Internet connection, if permitted by the bureau, on a form provided by the bureau. The application shall include the following information:* * *(x) Proof of workers' compensation coverage in 12345678910111213141516171819 compliance with the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0540PN0559 - 2 - 1234